Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1748
Collection of taxes; settlement of county treasurer; certificate to local authorities.

The county clerk shall also at the same time certify to the several authorities or persons with whom the county treasurer is to make settlement, showing the valuation of property and the amount of taxes and special assessments due thereon allowable to the treasurer in the settlement of his several accounts.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 173, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 6501;

C.S.1922, § 6029;

C.S.1929, § 77-1934;

R.S.1943, § 77-1748.